California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) If a certified claim for exclusion is not filed within 60 days of the date of the second notice of potential eligibility and an eligible transferee subsequently files a claim and qualifies for the exclusion, the assessor may, upon authorization by a county board of supervisors, require an eligible transferee to pay a one-time processing fee, collected at the time the claim is submitted, and reimbursed by the assessor if the
 claim is ineligible. The fee shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and shall not exceed the amount of the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the assessor for reassessment work done due to failure to file the claim for exclusion or one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), whichever is less.

(h) (1) After consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, the board shall, by emergency regulation, adopt regulations and produce claim forms and instructions necessary to implement this section and Section 2.1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(2) Any emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant
 to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 539, Sec. 2.   (SB 293)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

64.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (i) of Section 61 and subdivisions (c) and (d) of this section, the purchase or transfer of ownership interests in legal entities, such as corporate stock or partnership or limited liability company interests, shall not be deemed to constitute a transfer of the real property of the legal entity. This subdivision is applicable to the purchase or transfer of ownership interests in a partnership without regard to whether it is a continuing or a dissolved partnership.

(b) Any corporate reorganization, where all of the corporations involved are members of an affiliated group, and that qualifies as a reorganization under Section 368 of the United States Internal Revenue Code and that is accepted as a nontaxable event by similar California statutes, or any transfer of real property among members of an affiliated group, or any reorganization of farm credit institutions pursuant to the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971 (Public Law 92-181), as amended, shall not be a change of ownership. The taxpayer shall furnish proof, under penalty of perjury, to the assessor that the transfer meets the requirements of this subdivision.

For purposes of this subdivision, “affiliated group” means one or more chains of corporations connected through stock ownership with a common parent corporation if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) One hundred percent of the voting stock, exclusive of any share owned by directors, of each of the corporations, except the parent corporation, is owned by one or more of the other corporations.

(2) The common parent corporation owns, directly, 100 percent of the voting stock, exclusive of any shares owned by directors, of at least one of the other corporations.

(c) (1) When a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, other legal entity, or any other person obtains control through direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50 percent of the voting stock of any corporation, or obtains a majority ownership interest in any partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity through the purchase or transfer of corporate stock, partnership, or limited liability company interest, or ownership interests in other legal entities, including any purchase or transfer of 50 percent or less of the ownership interest through which control or a majority ownership interest is obtained, the purchase or transfer of that stock or other interest shall be a change of ownership of the real property owned by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity in which the controlling interest is obtained.

(2) On or after January 1, 1996, when an owner of a majority ownership interest in any partnership obtains all of the remaining ownership interests in that partnership or otherwise becomes the sole partner, the purchase or transfer of the minority interests, subject to the appropriate application of the step-transaction doctrine, shall not be a change in ownership of the real property owned by the partnership.

(d) If property is transferred on or after March 1, 1975, to a legal entity in a transaction excluded from change in ownership by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 62, then the persons holding ownership interests in that legal entity immediately after the transfer shall be considered the “original coowners.” Whenever shares or other ownership interests representing cumulatively more than 50 percent of the total interests in the entity are transferred by any of the original coowners in one or more transactions, a change in ownership of that real property owned by the legal entity shall have occurred, and the property that was previously excluded from change in ownership under the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 62 shall be reappraised.

The date of reappraisal shall be the date of the transfer of the ownership interest representing individually or cumulatively more than 50 percent of the interests in the entity.

A transfer of shares or other ownership interests that results in a change in control of a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or any other legal entity is subject to reappraisal as provided in subdivision (c) rather than this subdivision.

(e) To assist in the determination of whether a change of ownership has occurred under subdivisions (c) and (d), the Franchise Tax Board shall include a question in substantially the following form on returns for partnerships, banks, and corporations (except tax-exempt organizations):

If the corporation (or partnership or limited liability company) owns real property in California, has cumulatively more than 50 percent of the voting stock (or more than 50 percent of total interest in both partnership or limited liability company capital and partnership or limited liability company profits) (1) been transferred by the corporation (or partnership or limited liability company) since March 1, 1975, or (2) been acquired by another legal entity or person during the year? (See instructions.)

If the entity answers “yes” to (1) or (2) in the above question, then the Franchise Tax Board shall furnish the names and addresses of that entity and of the stock or partnership or limited liability company ownership interest transferees to the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

64.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 64, in the case of a legal entity that owns an active solar energy system pursuant to a partnership flip transaction, neither an initial transfer of a capital and profits interest in the legal entity, nor any subsequent change in the allocation of the capital and profits of the legal entity among the members, shall be deemed to constitute a transfer of control of, or of a majority interest in, the legal entity.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any real property owned by the legal entity other than the active solar energy system. Real property owned by the legal entity, other
 than the active solar energy system, shall be deemed to undergo a change in ownership to the extent otherwise provided under subdivision (c) of Section
 64.

(3) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to more than one partnership flip transaction with respect to any portion of an active solar energy system.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Active solar energy system” has the same meaning as defined in Section 73.

(2) “Initial transfer” means a transfer or series of transfers of an interest in a partnership or limited liability company used to own the active solar energy system and that commence prior to the date that the active solar energy system is placed in service for federal income tax purposes.

(3) “Partnership flip transaction” means a financing arrangement that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) A developer of an active solar energy system and one or more unrelated parties enter into the financing arrangement.

(B) As part of the initial transfer, the unrelated party or parties agree to provide a capital contribution, or a series of contributions, to a partnership or limited liability company in exchange for, on a cumulative basis, an interest in a majority of the tax attributes, such as federal tax credits, depreciation, and a majority of either, or both, the capital and profits of the entity.

(C) The unrelated party or parties receive the tax attributes until the party or parties achieve a
 preestablished yield or until after a preestablished period of time, at which time the tax attributes are reduced, and the developer obtains a majority of both the capital and profit interests of the partnership or limited liability company.

(c) If the parties to a partnership flip transaction sell or exchange ownership of the partnership or limited liability company in a transaction or series of transactions, that are separate and apart from the partnership flip transaction conducted pursuant to this section, in such a manner that a change in ownership of the partnership or limited liability company
 occurs under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 64, then paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to that transaction or transactions.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude from a change in ownership any other transfer or change in the allocation in the interest in profits and losses, or the ownership interests, in an active solar energy system that is not a partnership flip transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   (SB 267)   Effective September 30, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

65.

(a) The creation, transfer, or termination of any joint tenancy is a change in ownership except as provided in this section, Section 62, and Section 63. Upon a change in ownership of a joint tenancy interest only the interest or portion which is thereby transferred from one owner to another owner shall be reappraised.

(b) There shall be no change in ownership upon the creation or transfer of a joint tenancy interest if the transferor or transferors, after such creation or transfer, are among the joint tenants. Upon the creation of a joint tenancy interest described in this subdivision, the transferor or transferors shall be the “original transferor or transferors” for purposes of determining the property to be reappraised on subsequent transfers. The spouses of original transferors shall also be considered original transferors within the meaning of this section. 

(c) Upon the termination of an interest in any joint tenancy described in subdivision (b), the entire portion of the property held by the original transferor or transferors prior to the creation of the joint tenancy shall be reappraised unless it vests, in whole or in part, in any remaining original transferor, in which case there shall be no reappraisal. Upon the termination of the interest of the last surviving original transferor, there shall be a reappraisal of the interest then transferred and all other interests in the properties held by all original transferors which were previously excluded from reappraisal pursuant to this section.

(d) Upon the termination of an interest held by other than the original transferor in any joint tenancy described in subdivision (b), there shall be no reappraisal if the entire interest is transferred either to an original transferor or to all remaining joint tenants, provided that one of the remaining joint tenants is an original transferor.

(e) For purposes of this section, for joint tenancies created on or before March 1, 1975, it shall be rebuttably presumed that each joint tenant holding an interest in property as of March 1, 1975, shall be an “original transferor.” This presumption is not applicable to joint tenancies created after March 1, 1975.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1271, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

65.1.

(a) Except for a joint tenancy interest described in subdivision (f) of Section 62, when an interest in a portion of real property is purchased or changes ownership, only the interest or portion transferred shall be reappraised. A purchase or change in ownership of an interest with a market value of less than 5 percent of the value of the total property shall not be reappraised if the market value of the interest transferred is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) provided, however, that transfers during any one assessment year shall be cumulated for the purpose of determining the percentage interests and value transferred.

(b) If a unit or lot within a cooperative housing corporation, community apartment project, condominium, planned unit development, shopping center, industrial park, or other residential, commercial, or industrial land subdivision complex with common areas or facilities is purchased or changes ownership, then only the unit or lot transferred and the share in the common area reserved as an appurtenance of such unit or lot shall be reappraised.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the increase in property taxes resulting from such reappraisal shall be applied by the owner of such property to the tenant-shareholder, lessee, or occupant of such individual unit or lot only, and shall not be prorated among all other units or lots of such property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1141, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

66.

Change in ownership does not include any of the following:

(a) The creation, vesting, transfer, distribution, or termination of a participant’s or beneficiary’s interest in an employee benefit plan.

(b) Any contribution of real property to an employee benefit plan.

(c) Any acquisition by an employee benefit plan of the stock of the employer corporation pursuant to which the employee benefit plan obtains direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50 percent of the voting stock of the employer corporation.

As used in this section, the terms “employer,” “employee benefit plan,” “participant,” and “beneficiary” shall be defined as they are defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

67.

“Purchased” or “purchase” means a change in ownership for consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

68.

(a) For purposes of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution, the term “change in ownership” shall not include the acquisition of real property as a replacement for comparable property if the person acquiring the real property has been displaced from property in this state by eminent domain proceedings, by acquisition by a public entity, or by governmental action which has resulted in a judgment of inverse condemnation.

The adjusted base year value of the property acquired shall be the lower of the fair market value of the property acquired or the value which is the sum of the following:

(1) The adjusted base year
 value of the property from which the person was displaced.

(2) The amount, if any, by which the full cash value of the property acquired exceeds 120 percent of the amount received by the person for the property from which the person was displaced.

The provisions of this section shall apply to eminent domain proceedings, acquisitions, or judgments of inverse condemnation after March 1, 1975, and shall affect only those assessments of that property which occur after June 8, 1982.

(b) (1) A person acquiring replacement property shall request assessment under this section. A request made after four years following the date the property was acquired by eminent domain or purchase, or the date the judgment of inverse condemnation becomes final, shall be subject to subdivision (c).

(2) A change in the adjusted base year value of the replacement property acquired, resulting from the application of the provisions of this section, shall be deemed to be effective on the first day of the month following the month in which the property is acquired. The change in value shall be treated as a change in ownership for the purpose of placing supplemental assessments on the supplemental roll pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75). The assessor shall, however, appraise the replacement property acquired in accordance with the provisions of this section rather than the provisions of Section 75.10. The provisions of Chapter 3.5 shall be liberally construed in order to provide the benefits of this section and Section 2 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution to affected property owners at the earliest possible date.

(c) A request for assessment under this
 section that is made after four years following the date the property was acquired by eminent domain or purchase, or the date the judgment of inverse condemnation becomes final, shall apply to the lien dates for the last four fiscal years with appropriate roll corrections, refunds, or cancellations. Under an assessment granted pursuant to that request, the assessor shall adjust the base year value of the replacement property acquired in accordance with this section and make adjustments for both of the following:

(1) Inflation, as annually determined in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(2) Any subsequent new construction occurring with respect to the subject real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 454, Sec. 3.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

69.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, pursuant to Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the Constitution, the base year value of property that is substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster, as declared by the Governor, may be transferred to comparable property within the same county, which is acquired or newly constructed within five years after the disaster, including in the case of the Northridge earthquake, as a replacement for the substantially damaged or destroyed property. At the time the base year value of the substantially damaged or destroyed property is transferred to the replacement property, the substantially damaged or destroyed property shall be reassessed at its full cash value. However, the substantially damaged
 or destroyed property shall retain its base year value notwithstanding the transfer authorized by this section. If the owner or owners of substantially damaged or destroyed property receive property tax relief under this section, that property shall not be eligible for property tax relief under subdivision (c) of Section 70 in the event of its reconstruction.

(b) The replacement base year value of the replacement property acquired shall be determined in accordance with this section.

The assessor shall use the following procedure in determining the appropriate replacement base year value of comparable replacement property:

(1) If the full cash value of the comparable replacement property does not exceed 120 percent of the full cash value of the
 property substantially damaged or destroyed, then the adjusted base year value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be transferred to the comparable replacement property as its replacement base year value.

(2) If the full cash value of the replacement property exceeds 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, then the amount of the full cash value over 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be added to the adjusted base year value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed. The sum of these amounts shall become the replacement property’s replacement base year value.

(3) If the full cash value of the comparable replacement property is less than the
 adjusted base year value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, then that lower value shall become the replacement property’s base year value.

(4) The full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be the amount of its full cash value immediately prior to its substantial damage or destruction, as determined by the county assessor of the county in which the property is located.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) Property is substantially damaged or destroyed if either the land or the improvements sustain physical damage amounting to more than 50 percent of either the land’s or the improvement’s full cash value immediately prior to the disaster. Damage includes a diminution in the
 value of property as a result of restricted access to the property where the restricted access was caused by the disaster and is permanent in nature.

(2) Replacement property is comparable to the property substantially damaged or destroyed if it is similar in size, utility, and function to the property which it replaces.

(A) Property is similar in function if the replacement property is subject to similar governmental restrictions, such as zoning.

(B) Both the size and utility of property are interrelated and associated with value. Property is similar in size and utility only to the extent that the replacement property is, or is intended to be, used in the same manner as the property substantially damaged or destroyed and
 its full cash value does not exceed 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed.

(i) A replacement property or any portion thereof used or intended to be used for a purpose substantially different than the use made of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall to the extent of the dissimilar use be considered not similar in utility.

(ii) A replacement property or portion thereof that satisfies the use requirement but has a full cash value that exceeds 120 percent of the full cash value of the property substantially damaged or destroyed shall be considered, to the extent of the excess, not similar in utility and size.

(C) To the extent that replacement property, or
 any portion thereof, is not similar in function, size, and utility, the property, or portion thereof, shall be considered to have undergone a change in ownership when the replacement property is acquired or newly constructed.

(3) “Disaster” means a major misfortune or calamity in an area subsequently proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of the misfortune or calamity.

(d) (1) This section applies to any comparable replacement property acquired or newly constructed on or after July 1, 1985.

(2) The amendments made by Chapter 1053 of the Statutes of 1993 apply to any comparable replacement property that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for property
 substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster occurring on or after October 20, 1991, and to the determination of base year values for the 1991–92 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(3) The amendments made by Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2006 apply to any comparable replacement property that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for property substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster occurring on or after July 1, 2003, and to the determination of base year values for the 2003–04 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(e) Only the owner or owners of the property substantially damaged or destroyed, whether one or more individuals, partnerships, corporations, other legal entities, or a combination thereof, shall receive property tax relief under this
 section. Relief under this section shall be granted to an owner or owners of substantially damaged or destroyed property obtaining title to replacement property. The acquisition of an ownership interest in a legal entity, which directly or indirectly owns real property, is not an acquisition of comparable property.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of supervisors of the County of San Diego may by ordinance extend the time period specified in subdivision (a) to transfer the base year value of property that is substantially damaged or destroyed by the Cedar Fire that commenced in October 2003, as declared by the Governor, to comparable property within the same county that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the substantially damaged or destroyed property by two years. This subdivision shall apply to the
 determination of base year values for the 2003–04 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply commencing with the lien date for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the time period specified in subdivision (a) to transfer the base year value of qualified property to comparable property, that is within the same county and that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the qualified property, is extended by two years if the last day to transfer the base year value of the qualified property was on or after March 4, 2020, but on or before the COVID-19 emergency
 termination date or March 4, 2022, whichever is sooner.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the time period specified in subdivision (a) to transfer the base year value of qualified property to comparable property, that is within the same county and that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the qualified property, is extended by two years if the qualified property was substantially damaged or destroyed on or after March 4, 2020, but on or before the COVID-19 emergency termination date or March 4, 2022, whichever is sooner.

(3) This subdivision shall apply to the determination of base year values for the 2015–16 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, both of
 the following definitions apply:

(A) “COVID-19 emergency termination date” shall be the date the Governor proclaims the termination of the emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic that was proclaimed on March 4, 2020, pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(B) “Qualified property” means property that is substantially damaged or destroyed, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), by a disaster that is proclaimed by the Governor.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding any law, the time period specified in subdivision (a) to transfer the base year value of qualified property that is
 substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster, as declared by the Governor, to comparable property, that is within the same county and that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the property, is extended by three years if the qualified property was substantially damaged or destroyed on or after November 1, 2018, but on or before
 November 20, 2018.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to the determination of base year values for the 2018–19 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “qualified property” means property that was substantially damaged or destroyed, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), by the 2018 Camp Fire disaster, as proclaimed by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.   (AB 556)   Effective October 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

69.3.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, pursuant to the authority of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, a county board of supervisors, after consultation with affected local agencies located within the boundaries of the county, may adopt an ordinance that authorizes the transfer, subject to the conditions and limitations of this section, of the base year value of real property that is located within another county in this state and has been substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster to comparable replacement property, including land, of equal or lesser value that is located within the adopting county and has been acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the damaged or
 destroyed property within three years after the damage or destruction of the original property.

(2) The base year value of the original property shall be the base year value of the original property as determined in accordance with Section 110.1, with the inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1, determined as of the date immediately prior to the date that the original property was substantially damaged or destroyed. The base year value of the original property shall also include any inflation factor adjustments permitted by subdivision (f) of Section 110.1 for the period subsequent to the date of the substantial damage to, or destruction of, the original property and up to the date the replacement property is acquired or newly constructed, regardless of whether the claimant continued to own the original property during this entire period. The base year or years used to compute the base year value of the
 original property shall be deemed to be the base year or years of any property to which that base year value is transferred pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Affected local agency” means any city, special district, school district, or community college district that receives an annual allocation of ad valorem property tax revenues.

(2) “Claimant” means an owner or owners of real property claiming the property tax relief provided by this section.

(3) “Comparable replacement property” means a replacement property that has a full cash value of equal or lesser value as defined in paragraph (6).

(4) “Consultation” means a noticed hearing that is conducted by a
 county board of supervisors concerning the adoption of an ordinance described in subdivision (a) and with respect to which all affected local agencies within the boundaries of the county are provided with reasonable notice of the time and the place of the hearing and a reasonable opportunity to appear and participate.

(5) “Disaster” means a major misfortune or calamity in an area subsequently proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of the misfortune or calamity.

(6) “Equal or lesser value” means that the amount of the full cash value of the replacement property does not exceed one of the following:

(A) One hundred five percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the first year following the date
 of the damage or destruction of the original property.

(B) One hundred ten percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the second year following the date of the damage or destruction of the original property.

(C) One hundred fifteen percent of the amount of the full cash value of the original property if the replacement property is purchased or newly constructed within the third year following the date of the damage or destruction of the original property.

For purposes of this paragraph, if the replacement property is, in part, purchased and, in part, newly constructed, the date the “replacement property is purchased or newly constructed” is the date of the purchase or the date of completion of new construction, whichever is later.

(7) “Full cash value of the original property” means its full cash value, as determined in accordance with Section 110, immediately prior to its substantial damage or destruction, as determined by the county assessor of the county in which the property is located.

(8) “Full cash value of the replacement property” means its full cash value, as determined in accordance with Section 110.1 as of the date upon which it was purchased or new construction was completed, that is applicable on and after that date.

(9) “Original property” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied by a claimant as his or her principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is
 situated, that has been substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of original property includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as a site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. For purposes of this paragraph, each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate original property.

(10) “Owner or owners” means an individual or individuals, but does not include any firm, partnership, association, corporation, company, or other legal entity or organization of any kind.

(11) “Replacement property” means a building, structure, or other shelter constituting a place of abode, whether real property or personal property, that is owned and occupied
 by a claimant as his or her principal place of residence, and any land owned by the claimant on which the building, structure, or other shelter is situated. For purposes of this paragraph, land constituting a part of the replacement property includes only that area of reasonable size that is used as the site for a residence, and “land owned by the claimant” includes land for which the claimant either holds a leasehold interest described in subdivision (c) of Section 61 or a land purchase contract. For purposes of this paragraph, each unit of a multiunit dwelling shall be considered a separate replacement property. “Replacement property” does not include any property, including land or improvements, if the claimant owned any portion of that property prior to the date of the disaster that damaged or destroyed the original property.

(12) “Substantially damaged or destroyed” means property where either the land or the improvements sustain physical
 damage amounting to more than 50 percent of either the land’s or the improvement’s full cash value immediately prior to the disaster. Damage includes a diminution in the value of property as a result of restricted access to the property where the restricted access was caused by the disaster and is permanent in nature.

(c) At the time the base year value of the substantially damaged or destroyed property is transferred to the replacement property pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this section, the substantially damaged or destroyed property shall be reassessed at its full cash value. However, the substantially damaged or destroyed property shall retain its base year value notwithstanding that transfer. If the owner or owners of substantially damaged or destroyed property receive property tax relief under this section, that property shall not be eligible for property tax relief under subdivision (c) of Section 70 in the event of its
 reconstruction.

(d) Only the owner or owners of the property that has been substantially damaged or destroyed may receive property tax relief under an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section. Relief under an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be granted to an owner or owners of a substantially damaged or destroyed property obtaining comparable replacement property. The acquisition of an ownership interest in a legal entity that, directly or indirectly, owns real property is not an acquisition of comparable replacement property for purposes of this section.

(e) A timely claim for relief under an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section, in that form as shall be prescribed by the board, shall be filed by the owner with the assessor of the county in which the replacement property is located. No relief under an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be
 granted unless the claim is filed no later than January 1, 1996, or within three years after the replacement property is acquired or newly constructed, whichever is later.

(f) Any taxes that were levied on the replacement property prior to the filing of a claim on the basis of the replacement property’s new base year value, and any allowable annual adjustments thereto, shall be canceled or refunded to the claimant to the extent that taxes exceed the amount that would be due when determined on the basis of the adjusted new base year value.

(g) This section shall apply to any comparable replacement property of equal or lesser value that is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for property that has been substantially damaged or destroyed by a disaster occurring on or after October 20, 1991, and to the determination of base year values for the 1991–92 fiscal year and each
 fiscal year thereafter.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply commencing with the lien date for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 3.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

69.4.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, pursuant to the authority of subdivision (i) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, the base year value of qualified contaminated property may be transferred, subject to the conditions and limitations of that subdivision and this section, to a comparable replacement property of equal or lesser value that is located in the same county and is acquired or newly constructed as a replacement for the contaminated property, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of that subdivision.

(2) The limitation in paragraph (1) requiring that the qualified contaminated property and the replacement property be located
 in the same county does not apply in a county in which the county board of supervisors adopts a resolution making the provisions of this section applicable to replacement properties acquired to replace qualified contaminated properties located in another county within this state. The resolution shall specify the date on and after which its provisions are applicable. The specified date may be a date earlier than the date on which the county adopts the ordinance, but no earlier than November 3, 1998.

(b) The replacement property shall be acquired or newly constructed within five years after the original property is sold or otherwise transferred.

(c) (1) Upon the sale or transfer of the original property, the assessor shall determine a new base year value for that property in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA
 of the California Constitution and Section 110.1.

(2) This section does not apply unless the sale or transfer of the original property is a change in ownership that does either of the following:
